Wyoming statutes. Title 29 Liens
Chapter 5 Owners and Operators of Harvesting Machines

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture §§ 8 to 18.

§ 29-5-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Crops” means any agricultural products grown or processed in this state;

“Elevators” means facilities leasing space for storage of crops;

“Harvesting” means cubing, baling, threshing, combining, swathing, chopping, digging, picking or shelling crops.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 16, § 8; R.S. 1931, § 66-808; C.S. 1945, § 34-1508; W.S. 1957, § 29-92; W.S. 1977, §

29-5-101

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 29-5-102.
Persons entitled to lien; extent thereof.

All persons owning or operating harvesting machines are entitled to a lien on the crops harvested by them for the work performed in harvesting the crops.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 16, § 1; 1927, ch. 77, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 66-801; Laws 1933, ch. 11, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 34-1501; W.S. 1957, § 29-93; W.S. 1977, §

29-5-102

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

§ 29-5-103.
Lien statement to be filed; contents; mistake in description not fatal; notice to purchaser or owner.

Every person proceeding under this chapter shall file a lien statement sworn before a notarial officer setting forth the amount claimed to be due him with the county clerk of the county in which the crops were grown, within thirty (30) days after:

The last work performed under contract in the harvesting of the crops; or

The work was substantially completed.

In addition to the requirements of W.S. 29-1-312(a) this statement shall contain:

A description of the legal subdivision of land where the crops are stored; and

If the crops are stored in an elevator, the location of the elevator.

Any error or mistake in the statement describing the crops or the property on which they were raised shall not invalidate the lien.

If the crops are being hauled from the machine direct to the elevator or to any purchaser any person desiring to claim a lien by proceeding under this chapter shall serve written notice on the purchaser or the owner of the crops that he may claim a lien on the crops for his work performed.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 16, § 2; 1927, ch. 77, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 66-802; C.S. 1945, § 34-1502; W.S. 1957, § 29-94; W.S. 1977, §

29-5-103

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2008, ch. 20, § 2; 2010, ch. 92, § 2.

Cross references. —

See also §

29-2-109

and cross references thereunder. As to duration of lien, see §

29-5-105

.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “notarial officer” for “notary public” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, substituted “W.S. 29-1-312(a)” for “W.S. 29-1-301(a)” in the introductory language of (b).

§ 29-5-104.
Priority of lien.

The lien for work performed as specified in W.S.

29-5-102

has precedence over any mortgage or encumbrance except those created by W.S.

29-8-102

relating to liens for the production of farm products under contracts executed, entered into, renewed or substantively amended after July 1, 2001.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 16, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 66-804; C.S. 1945, § 34-1504; W.S. 1957, § 29-96; W.S. 1977, §

29-5-105

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2; 2001, ch. 126, § 2.

§ 29-5-105.
Limitation of actions; duration of lien.

Actions for the foreclosure of the lien provided by this chapter shall be commenced within sixty (60) days from the filing of the lien statement. No lien continues to exist by virtue of this chapter for more than sixty (60) days after the lien is filed unless within that time a civil action is instituted to obtain a judgment. When any action commences within the sixty (60) days, the lien continues until the suit is finally determined and satisfied.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 16, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 66-805; C.S. 1945, § 34-1505; W.S. 1957, § 29-97; W.S. 1977, §

29-5-106

; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.

Cross references. —

See also §

29-2-109

and notes thereunder. As to filing of lien and notice to purchasers, see §

29-5-103

.

§ 29-5-106.
Removal of encumbered property without lienholder's consent; penalty.

If any person removes any property covered by the lien created by this chapter from the place where the property is located when the lien statement is filed without the written consent of the holder of the lien, either originally or by transfer, the person causing the property to be removed is guilty of a misdemeanor. On conviction he may be fined not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 16, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 66-810; C.S. 1945, § 34-1510; W.S. 1957, § 29-101; W.S. 1977, § 29-5-110; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 17, § 2.